ncx.twol
Alphabet
 
 A B C D E F G H I J K L M N Ñ O P Q R S T U W X Y Z
 a b c d e f g h i j k l m n ñ o p q r s t u w x y z 
;


Sets

Vow   = A E I O U a e i o u ;

Cns   = b c d f g h j k l m n ñ p q r s t w x y z ;

Rules
"Remove morpheme boundary"
%>:0 <=> _ ;

"Posesivo vocal con vocal (m)"
%{m%}:m <=> n _ %{i%}:i %>: Vow ;

"Posesivo vocal con vocal (i)"
%{i%}:i <=> n %{m%}:m _ %>: Vow ;

"Posesivo cns con cns (m)"
%{m%}:0 <=> n _ %{i%}:0 %>: Cns ;

"Posesivo cns con cns (i)"
%{i%}:0 <=> n %{m%}:0 _ %>: Cns ;
